Hawaii statutes.
§437D-8 Rate disclosure requirements; oral
or written statements. Each lessor, and each officer, employee, agent, or
other representative of the lessor, who makes any oral statement, excluding
telephonic communications, or written statement of the rental cost of a
vehicle, shall disclose, in plain language and in conjunction with that
statement, the daily rate of the applicable damage waiver and that the rate
constitutes an additional daily charge to the lessee. [L 1988, c 251, pt of §2;
am L 2009, c 148, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next